Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.260

Deficiencies prohibited—Exceptions.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any agency head or disbursing officer to incur any cash deficiency and any appointive officer or employee violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to summary removal.

(2) This section does not apply to:

(a) Temporary cash deficiencies resulting from disbursements under a expenditure plan approved under RCW 43.88.110.

(b) Temporary cash deficiencies authorized by the director of financial management for funds and accounts in the state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer. Each authorization under this subsection (b) shall distinctly specify the fund or account for which a deficiency is authorized, the maximum amount of cash deficiency which may be incurred, and the maximum time period during which the cash deficiency may continue. Each authorization shall expire at the end of each fiscal biennium unless renewed by the director of financial management. The director of financial management shall report each authorization and renewal to the legislative fiscal committees.

(c) Temporary cash deficiencies in funds or accounts which are neither in the state treasury, nor in the custody of the treasurer, if the cash deficiency does not continue past the end of the fiscal biennium.

(3) Nothing in this section permits the expenditure of moneys in excess of an applicable appropriation.

[ 1987 c 502 s 7; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 83 s 2.]